Oklahoma, session 2025, SB15.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1279, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1279.


MISDEMEANOR POINTING A FIREARM


Except for an act of self-defense, it It shall be unlawful for


any person to point any pistol a firearm or any other deadly weapon,


whether loaded or not, at any other another person or persons. Any

Req. No. 69 Page 1


person violating convicted of a violation of the provisions of this


section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor


punishable be punished as provided in Section 1280 of this title.


Any person convicted of violating the The provisions of this


section after having been issued a handgun license pursuant to the


provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act may be subject to an


administrative violation as provided in Section 1280 of this title


shall not apply to a person acting in self-defense or to a home or


business owner in defense of the owner’s private property.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1280, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1280.


PENALTY FOR 1279


Any person violating the provisions of Section 1279 of this


title shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable


by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more


than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) and shall be imprisoned,


imprisonment in the county jail for a period not less than three (3)


nor more than to exceed twelve (12) months. Any person convicted of


violating the provisions of Section 1279 of this title after having


been issued a handgun license pursuant to the provisions of the


Oklahoma Self-Defense Act shall have the handgun license revoked and


shall be liable for an administrative fine of Fifty Dollars ($50.00)


upon a hearing and determination by the Oklahoma State Bureau of

Req. No. 69 Page 2


Investigation that the person is in violation of the provisions of


this section, or by both such fine and imprisonment.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1289.16, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1289.16


FELONY POINTING FIREARMS


Except for an act of self-defense, it


A. It shall be unlawful for any person to willfully or without


lawful cause point a shotgun, rifle or pistol, firearm or any other


deadly weapon, whether loaded or not, at any another person or


persons for the purpose of threatening or with the intention of


discharging the firearm or with any malice or for any purpose of


injuring, either through physical injury or mental or emotional


intimidation or for purposes of whimsy, humor or prank, or in anger


or otherwise, but not to include the pointing of shotguns, rifles or


pistols except by law:


1. A person who can legally own or possess a weapon pursuant to


the provisions of Section 1272 of this title:


a. during an act of self-defense, or


b. in defense of private property, located on any


premises, owned, rented, leased, or occupied by


permission of the property owner;


2. A person in the defensive display of a firearm or other


deadly weapon, as provided for in Section 1289.25 of this title;

Req. No. 69 Page 3


3. Law enforcement authorities in the performance of their


duties, armed;


4. Armed security guards licensed by the Council on Law


Enforcement Education and Training pursuant to the Oklahoma Security


Guard and Private Investigator Act in the performance of their


duties, members;


5. Members of the state military forces in the performance of


their duties, members;


6. Members of the federal military reserve and active military


components in the performance of their duties, or any federal;


7. Federal government law enforcement officer officers in the


performance of any duty, their duties; or in


8. Any person during the performance of a play on stage, while


participating in a rodeo, or when participating in a television


program or on film, or in defense of any person, one’s home or


property project.


B. Any person convicted of a violation of the provisions of


this section shall be punished as provided in Section 1289.17 of


this title.


Any person convicted of a violation of the provisions of this


section after having been issued a handgun license pursuant to the


Oklahoma Self-Defense Act shall have the license revoked and shall


be subject to an administrative fine of One Thousand Dollars


($1,000.00), upon a hearing and determination by the Oklahoma State

Req. No. 69 Page 4


Bureau of Investigation that the person is in violation of the


provisions of this section.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1289.25, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1289.25


PHYSICAL OR DEADLY FORCE AGAINST INTRUDER


A. The Legislature hereby recognizes that the citizens of the


State of Oklahoma this state have a right to expect absolute safety


within their own homes, places of business or, places of worship, or


occupied premises and have the right to establish policies regarding


the possession of weapons on property pursuant to the provisions of


Section 1290.22 of this title.


B. A person, regardless of official capacity or lack of


official capacity, within a place of worship or a person, an owner,


manager, or employee of a business is presumed to have held a


reasonable fear of imminent peril of death or great bodily harm to


himself or herself or another when using defensive force that is


intended or likely to cause death or great bodily harm to another


if:


1. a. The the person against whom the defensive force was


used was in the process of unlawfully and forcefully


entering, or had unlawfully and forcibly entered, a


dwelling, residence, occupied vehicle, place of


business or, place of worship, or any other occupied

Req. No. 69 Page 5


premises or if that person had removed or was


attempting to remove another against the will of that


person from the dwelling, residence, occupied vehicle,


place of business or, place of worship., or any other


occupied premises, and


b. The the person who uses defensive force knew or had


reason to believe that an unlawful and forcible entry


or unlawful and forcible act on the occupied premises


was occurring or had occurred; or


2. The person who uses defensive force knew or had a reasonable


belief that the person against whom the defensive force was used


entered or was attempting to enter into a dwelling, residence,


occupied vehicle, place of business or, place of worship, or any


other occupied premises for the purpose of committing a forcible


felony, as defined in Section 733 of this title, and that the


defensive force was necessary to prevent the commission of the


forcible felony.


C. The presumption set forth in subsection B of this section


does not apply if:


1. The person against whom the defensive force is used has the


right to be in or is a lawful resident of the dwelling, residence,


or vehicle, or any other occupied premises such as an owner, lessee,


or titleholder, and there is not a protective order from domestic



Req. No. 69 Page 6


violence in effect or a written pretrial supervision order of no


contact against that person;


2. The person or persons sought to be removed are children or


grandchildren, or are otherwise in the lawful custody or under the


lawful guardianship, of, the person against whom the defensive force


is used; or


3. The person who uses defensive force is engaged in an


unlawful activity or is using the dwelling, residence, occupied


vehicle, place of business or, place of worship, or any other


occupied premises to further an unlawful activity.


D. A person who is not engaged in an unlawful activity and who


is attacked in any other place where he or she has a right to be has


no duty to retreat and has the right to stand his or her ground and


meet force with force, including deadly force, if he or she


reasonably believes it is necessary to do so to prevent death or


great bodily harm to himself or herself or another or to prevent the


commission of a forcible felony.


E. A person who unlawfully and by force enters or attempts to


enter the dwelling, residence, occupied vehicle of another person,


place of business or, place of worship, or any other occupied


premises is presumed to be doing so with the intent to commit an


unlawful act involving force or violence.


F. A person who uses defensive force, as permitted pursuant to


the provisions of subsections A, B, D and E of this section, is

Req. No. 69 Page 7


justified in using such defensive force and is immune from criminal


prosecution and civil action for the use of such defensive force.


As used in this subsection, the term “criminal prosecution” includes


charging or prosecuting the defendant.


G. A law enforcement agency may use standard procedures for


investigating the use of defensive force, but the law enforcement


agency may not arrest the person for using defensive force unless it


determines that there is probable cause that the defensive force


that was used was unlawful.


H. The court shall award reasonable attorney fees, court costs,


compensation for loss of income, and all expenses incurred by the


defendant in defense of any civil action brought by a plaintiff if


the court finds that the defendant is immune from prosecution as


provided in subsection F of this section.


I. The provisions of this section and the provisions of the


Oklahoma Self-Defense Act shall not be construed to require any


person using a weapon pursuant to the provisions of this section to


be licensed in any manner.


J. A person pointing a weapon at a perpetrator in self-defense


or in order to thwart, stop, or deter a forcible felony or attempted


forcible felony shall not be deemed found guilty of committing a


criminal act.


K. 1. The defensive display of a firearm or other deadly


weapon by a person shall not be a criminal act if a reasonable

Req. No. 69 Page 8


person would believe that physical force is immediately necessary to


protect himself, herself, or another person against the use or


attempted use of unlawful physical or deadly force by another or in


defense of private property, located on any premises, owned, rented,


leased, or occupied by permission of the property owner.


2. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a


person who:


a. intentionally provokes another person to use or


attempt to use unlawful physical or deadly force, or


b. uses a firearm during the commission of an unlawful


act involving force or violence.


3. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to


require the defensive display of a firearm or any other deadly


weapon before the use of defensive force or the threat of defensive


force by a person who is justified in the use or threatened use of


defensive force.


L. As used in this section:


1. “Defensive display of a firearm” includes but is not limited


to:


a. verbally informing another person that the person


possesses or has available a firearm or other deadly


weapon,


b. exposing or displaying a firearm or any other deadly


weapon in a manner that a reasonable person would

Req. No. 69 Page 9


understand was meant to protect the person against the


use or attempted use by another of unlawful physical


or deadly force, or


c. placing the hand of the person on a firearm or other


deadly weapon while the firearm is contained in a


pocket, purse, holster, sling scabbard, case, or other


means of containment or transport;


2. “Defensive force” includes, but shall is not be limited to,


pointing a weapon at a perpetrator in self-defense or in order to


thwart, stop, or deter a forcible felony or attempted forcible


felony;


2. 3. “Dwelling” means a building or conveyance of any kind,


including any attached porch, whether the building or conveyance is


temporary or permanent, mobile or immobile, which has a roof over


it, including a tent, and is designed to be occupied by people;


4. “Occupied premises” means any premises occupied by an owner,


tenant, lessee, guest, or authorized user of the premises, including


their agents;


3. 5. “Place of worship” means:


a. any permanent building, structure, facility, or office


space owned, leased, rented, or borrowed, on a full-


time basis, when used for worship services,


activities, and business of the congregation, which



Req. No. 69 Page 10


may include, but not be limited to, churches, temples,


synagogues, and mosques, and


b. any permanent building, structure, facility, or office


space owned, leased, rented, or borrowed for use on a


temporary basis, when used for worship services,


activities, and business of the congregation


including, but not limited to, churches, temples,


synagogues, and mosques;


4. 6. “Residence” means a dwelling in which a person resides


either temporarily or permanently or is visiting as an invited


guest; and


5. 7. “Vehicle” means a conveyance of any kind, whether or not


motorized, which is designed to transport people or property.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-69 CN 12/9/2024 8:52:43 AM











Req. No. 69 Page 11